Florida, session 2026, HB6027.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (8) of
section 193.155, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
193.155 Homestead assessments.—Homestead property shall be
assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving
the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed
at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property
receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8)
apply.
(8) Property assessed under this section shall be assessed
at less than just value when the person who establishes a new
homestead has received a homestead exemption as of January 1 of
any of the 3 immediately preceding years. For purposes of this
subsection, a husband and wife who owned and both permanently
resided on a previous homestead shall each be considered to have
received the homestead exemption even though only the husband or
the wife applied for the homestead exemption on the previous
homestead. The assessed value of the newly established homestead
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6027 2026
shall be determined as provided in this subsection.
(a) If the just value of the new homestead as of January 1
is greater than or equal to the just value of the immediate
prior homestead as of January 1 of the year in which the
immediate prior homestead was abandoned, the assessed value of
the new homestead shall be the just value of the new homestead
minus an amount equal to the lesser of $500,000 or the
difference between the just value and the assessed value of the
immediate prior homestead as of January 1 of the year in which
the prior homestead was abandoned. Thereafter, the homestead
shall be assessed as provided in this section.
(b) If the just value of the new homestead as of January 1
is less than the just value of the immediate prior homestead as
of January 1 of the year in which the immediate prior homestead
was abandoned, the assessed value of the new homestead shall be
equal to the just value of the new homestead divided by the just
value of the immediate prior homestead and multiplied by the
assessed value of the immediate prior homestead. However, if the
difference between the just value of the new homestead and the
assessed value of the new homestead calculated pursuant to this
paragraph is greater than $500,000, the assessed value of the
new homestead shall be increased so that the difference between
the just value and the assessed value equals $500,000.
Thereafter, the homestead shall be assessed as provided in this
section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6027-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6027 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6027-00